src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! ##### Tests:
!!€# кай%>%{аӓ%}ш 
!!€0 ка0%>яш 
 
"Affix initial back а:я rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 а:я <=> й:0 (HarmDummies:) %> _ \[ %^А2ЫӸ: ] ; 
 
"Not SgNom а:ы rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
а:ы <=> 
         Cns+ _ %{back%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ; 
!BackVow Cns+ _ %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ; 
 
"Not SgNom а:ӹ rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
а:ӹ <=> 
           Cns+ _ %{front%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ; 
!FrontVow Cns+ _ %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ; 
 
 
"suffix-final vowel backed %{ыӹ%}ы rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{ыӹ%}:ы <=> BHARM Cns _ [ м %{ыӹØ%}: | %>  (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns: | # ] ; 
          [BHARM (й ( %^ConsTransf:0 ))| а:ы %{back%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0 ] %> [ (0:ы) ж | ш т | %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ] ] _ [ %> (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns:  | # ] ; 
 
!  BHARM %> [ ж: | д %{ыӹ%}: м | ( %{ыӹØ%}: ) м | ( %{ыӹØ%}: ) ш ] _ [ #: | %> [ л | г | ш [ т | к ] | д | %{ыӹØ%}: [ м | н ] ]] ; 
!          BHARM %> д _ м %{ыӹ%}: ; 
! Work 2012-10-29            %>  %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ]  _ %> %{ыӹØ%}: ; 
 
 
"suffix-final vowel fronted %{ыӹ%}:ӹ rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{ыӹ%}:ӹ <=> FHARM Cns _ [ м %{ыӹØ%}: | %> (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns: | # ] ; 
          [FHARM (й ( %^ConsTransf:0 ))| а:ӹ %{front%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0  ] %> [ (0:ӹ ) ж | ш т | %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ] ] _ [ %> (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns:  | # ] ; 
! FHARM Cns _ [ %> :0* Cns: | # ] ; 
!          FHARM й ( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %> [ ж | ш т ] _ [ %>  :0* Cns:  | # ] ; 
 
!! ### Consonant loss or transformation rules
 
"т:0 in am type verbs rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** лӓктӓш:лӓкнӓ 
т:0 <=> к _ %^ConsTransf:0 ; 
 
"к:0 in am type verbs rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** качкаш:качна 
к:0 <=> [ ш | ч ] _ %^ConsTransf:0 ; 
 
"з:ц in am type verbs rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** вазаш:вацна 
з:ц <=> [ Vow | н: ] _ %^ConsTransf:0 ; 
 
"н:0 before з:ц in am type verbs rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** негӹнзӓш:негӹц 
н:0 <=>  _ з: %^ConsTransf:0 ; 
 
!! ### Vowel addition rules 
 
!! #### Vowel gain 
"0:ы between ш _ ж rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** йиш:йишӹжӹ 
0:ы <=> [ BHARM ш | ш %{back%}: ] %> _ ж %{ыӹ%}: ; 
 
"0:ӹ between ш _ ж rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** йиш:йишӹжӹ 
0:ӹ <=> [ FHARM ш | ш %{front%}: ] %> _ ж %{ыӹ%}: ; 
 
 
!! ### Vowel loss rules

"suffix-final vowel loss before subsequent suffix-initial vowel %{ыӹ%}:0 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  %{ыӹ%}:0 <=>    Cns %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: [ д %{ыӹ%}: м | м | ш ( т | к ) ]| (0:ы|0:ӹ) ж: ] _ %> [ Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | А2: ] ; 
! Vow %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ] | ж: ] _ %> [ л | г | %{ыӹØ%}: ш | ш | д | Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | А2: ] ; 
 
"Not SgNom for lat а:0 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
а:0 <=> Cns:+ _ %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> е  ; 
        # [ Cns: | Vow: | %> ]+ Cns:+ _ %> [ ӹ: | ы: ] %> ;            
 
"Not SgNom for lat е:0 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
е:0 <=> 
        Cns:+ (ь) _ %> [ ӹ: | ы: ] %> ;            

!! ##### Tests:
!!€ варенье%>ӹ%>влӓ 
!!€ варень0%>ӹ%>влӓ 
 
!! ## Devoicing 
"Onset consonant devoicing rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 ж:ш <=> [ :Cst ( :0 ) | ж ] ( %^ConsTransf:0 (Ь2: ) ) %> _ [ %{ыӹØ%}: | %{ыӹ%}: ] ; 
 
 
 
! ### DISALLOW rules
 
!"Disallow Е2:0 after Letters rule"
!!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!Е2:0 /<= Ltrs _ ; 
